Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2
ADMINISTRATION

25.5-4-201. Cash system of accounting - financial administration of medical services premiums - medical programs administered by department of human services - federal contributions - rules.

The state department shall utilize the cash system of accounting, as enunciated by the governmental accounting standards board, regardless of the source of revenues involved, for all activities of the state department relating to the financial administration of any nonadministrative expenditure that qualifies for federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", and for the administration of the state-funded health and medical care program, created pursuant to section 25.5-2-104, and for the state children's basic health plan, created pursuant to section 25.5-2-105, except for expenditures under the program for the medically indigent, article 3 of this title 25.5.

(1.5) (a) The state department shall utilize the cash system of accounting, as enunciated by the governmental accounting standards board, for the contributions required by 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396u-5 (c).

The contributions required by 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396u-5 (c) shall be made in the manner required by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services, or any successor agency. Nothing in this paragraph (b) shall require the state department to make the contribution before the contribution is due.

The executive director shall promulgate rules to identify the programs utilizing the cash system of accounting.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 917, § 1, effective May 11; entire article added with relocations, p. 1821, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1.5) added, p. 465, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1.5) amended, (SB 09-265), ch. 205, p. 935, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2841, § 12, effective June 7.

25.5-4-202. Comprehensive plan for other services and benefits. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1821, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section repealed, (HB 16-1081), ch. 22, p. 52, § 6, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 26-4-107 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-203. Advisory council established.

There is created the state medical assistance and services advisory council, referred to in this article 4 as the "advisory council", consisting of sixteen members, as follows:

The executive director of the state department and the executive director of the department of health, the executive directors' designees, or the executive directors' successors in function, as ex officio members; and

Fourteen members, appointed by the governor and chosen by the governor to represent the various areas of medical services and the public as follows:

Two members who are doctors of medicine licensed in this state;

One member who is a doctor of osteopathy licensed in this state;

One member who is a dentist licensed in this state;

One member who is an optometrist licensed in this state;

One member who is an owner or operator of a licensed nursing facility in this state;

One member who represents licensed hospitals in this state;

One member who is a pharmacist licensed in this state;

One member who is a professional nurse licensed in this state;

One member who has provided home health-care services for three years;

Three members who are not directly associated with the areas of medical services to represent the public; and

One member who may represent any other area of medical services not specifically enumerated but shall not be limited thereto.

Members serve at the pleasure of the governor and receive no compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for their actual and necessary expenses. The advisory council shall advise the state department on the provision of health and medical care services to recipients.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1822, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 64, § 87, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-108 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-204. Automated medical assistance administration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the agency responsible for the administration of the state's medical assistance program would be more effective in its ability to streamline administrative functions of program administrators and providers under the program through the implementation of an automated system that will provide for the following:

Electronic claim submittals;

Online eligibility determinations;

Electronic remittance statements;

Electronic fund transfers; and

Automation of other administrative functions associated with the medical assistance program.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is appropriate to enact legislation, as set forth in subsection (3) of this section, that authorizes the state department to develop and implement an automated system for processing claims and payments under the medical assistance program, as well as for other administrative functions associated with the program.

The executive director of the state department shall develop and implement an automated system through which medical assistance claims and payments and eligibility determinations or other related transactions may be processed. The system shall provide for the use of automated electronic technologies. The automated system may be implemented in phases if deemed necessary by the executive director. The automated system shall be implemented only after the executive director determines that:

Technology is available and proven to perform satisfactorily in a production environment;

Adequate financing is available to facilitate the implementation and maintenance of the system. Financing may include, but is not limited to, federal funds, appropriations from the general fund, provider transaction fees, or any other financing mechanisms which the state department may impose, and grants or contributions from public or private entities.

The system has been successfully installed and fully tested; and

Adequate provider training has been provided for an orderly implementation.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1822, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-403.7 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-205. Application - verification of eligibility - demonstration project - rules.

Determination of eligibility for medical benefits shall be made by the county department in which the applicant resides, except as otherwise specified in this section. Local social security offices also determine eligibility for medicaid benefits at the same time they determine eligibility for supplemental security income. The state department may accept medical assistance applications and determine medical assistance eligibility and may designate the private service contractor that administers the children's basic health plan, Denver health and hospitals, a hospital that is designated as a regional pediatric trauma center, as defined in section 25-3.5-703 (4)(f), C.R.S., and other medical assistance sites determined necessary by the state department to accept medical assistance applications, to determine medical assistance eligibility, and to determine presumptive eligibility. When the state department determines that it is necessary to designate an additional medical assistance site, the state department shall notify the county in which the medical assistance site is located that an additional medical assistance site has been designated. Any person who is determined to be eligible pursuant to the requirements of this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title shall be eligible for benefits until such person is determined to be ineligible. Upon determination that any person is ineligible for medical benefits, the county department, the state department, or other entity designated by the state department shall notify the applicant in writing of its decision and the reason therefor. When an applicant is found ineligible for medical assistance eligibility programs, the applicant's application data and verifications shall be automatically shared with the state insurance marketplace through a system interface. Separate determination of eligibility and formal application for benefits under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title for persons eligible as provided in sections 25.5-5-101 and 25.5-5-201 shall be made in accordance with the rules of the state department.

Repealed.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a.7) is effective until July 1, 2024.] As part of the medicaid eligibility modernization, the department is authorized to create a universal application for single point of entry for home- and community-based services waivers for children.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a.7) is effective July 1, 2024.] As part of the medicaid eligibility modernization, the department is authorized to create a universal application for case management agencies for home- and community-based services waivers for children.

The state department shall develop training safeguards to prevent actions taken by staff of medical assistance sites from affecting food and cash assistance eligibility.

Any married couple, at the beginning of a continuous period of institutionalization of one spouse, may request the county department to assess and document the total value of the resources of the couple, if the couple supplies to the county department the necessary information and documentation which is needed to make such an assessment.

Any assessment prepared by the county department and provided to a couple shall contain a procedure for appealing any determinations which have been made.

If a request for assessment and documentation is not part of an application for medical assistance, the county department may establish a fee not exceeding the reasonable expenses of the county department of providing and documenting such assessment.

The state department shall promulgate rules to simplify the processing of applications in order that medical benefits are furnished to recipients as soon as possible, including rules that:

Provide for initial processing of applications and determination of eligibility for medical assistance only at locations other than the county departments, at locations used for processing applications for the Colorado works program, or at the location used by the private service contractor that administers the children's basic health plan for determining eligibility of children for the plan; and

May make provision for the payment of medical benefits for a period not to exceed three months prior to the date of application in cases where the applicant did not make application prior to his or her need for said medical benefits.

The state department shall promulgate rules that:

To the extent authorized under federal law, require an applicant to state only the applicant's income and require the state department to verify the applicant's income through federally approved electronic data sources; except that, if electronic data is not available, or the information obtained from an electronic data source is not reasonably compatible with information provided by or on behalf of an applicant, the rules shall require an individual to provide documentation in order to verify the applicant's income; and

Require the state department at least annually to verify a recipient's income eligibility at reenrollment through federally approved electronic data sources and, if the recipient meets all eligibility requirements, permit the recipient to remain enrolled in the program. The rules shall only require an individual to provide documentation verifying income if electronic data is not available, or the information obtained from electronic data sources is not reasonably compatible with information provided by or on behalf of an applicant.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1974, § 96, effective August 5, 2009.)

(I.5) (A) If the state department determines that a recipient was not eligible for medical benefits solely based upon the recipient's income after the recipient had been determined to be eligible based upon electronic data obtained through a federally approved electronic data source, the state department shall not pursue recovery from a county department for the cost of medical services provided to the recipient, and the county department is not responsible for any federal error rate sanctions resulting from such determination.

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision in this paragraph (b), for applications that contain self-employment income, the state department shall not implement this paragraph (b) until it can verify self-employment income through federally approved electronic data sources as authorized by rules of the state department and federal law.

Repealed.

Adequate safeguards shall be established by the state department to ensure that only eligible persons receive benefits under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title.

In addition, an applicant who is eighteen years of age or older shall be required to supply a form of personal photographic identification either by providing a valid Colorado driver's license or a valid identification card issued by the department of revenue pursuant to section 42-2-302, C.R.S. The state department may adopt rules that exempt applicants from the requirement of supplying a form of personal photographic identification if the requirement causes an unreasonable hardship or if the requirement is in conflict with federal law.

The state department shall also adopt rules that allow for assistance to be provided until the applicant is able to obtain or qualify for a driver's license or identification card; however, a county department or an entity designated by the state department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is not required to pursue recovery of assistance from an applicant who fails, upon recertification, to meet the photographic identification requirement.

In collaboration with and to augment the state department's efforts to simplify eligibility determinations for benefits under the state medical assistance program and the children's basic health plan, the state department shall establish a process so that a recipient, enrollee, or the parent or guardian of a recipient or enrollee may apply for reenrollment either over the telephone or through the internet.

Subject to receipt of federal authorization and spending authority, the state department may implement a pilot program that allows a limited number of recipients or enrollees to apply for reenrollment either over the telephone or through the internet during a transition to a process that will serve recipients and enrollees statewide. The pilot program shall not serve as a replacement for a statewide process.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this paragraph (e), the state department shall not implement this paragraph (e) until it can verify the eligibility of a recipient or enrollee over the telephone or through the internet as authorized by rules of the state department and federal law.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this paragraph (e), the state department shall not implement or administer any portion of this paragraph (e) until spending authority has been received in the general appropriation act or any supplemental appropriation and shall only implement and administer this paragraph (e) to the extent of such spending authority.

The state department may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations from public or private sources for the development or implementation of reenrollment either over the telephone or through the internet process described in this paragraph (e); except that the state department may not accept a gift, grant, or donation that is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with this paragraph (e) or any other law. Any gifts, grants, or donations received by the state department shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the department of health care policy and financing cash fund created pursuant to section 25.5-1-109.

By signing an application for medical assistance, a person assigns to the state department, by operation of law, all rights the applicant may have to medical support or payments for medical expenses from any other person on the applicant's own behalf or on behalf of any other member of the applicant's family for whom application is made. For purposes of this subsection (4), an assignment takes effect upon the determination that the applicant is eligible for medical assistance and up to three months prior to the date of application if the applicant meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section and shall remain in effect so long as an individual is eligible for and receives medical assistance benefits. The application shall contain a statement explaining this assignment.

An applicant for medical benefits upon initial application and each redetermination shall disclose any third party who may be responsible for the payment of medical expenses on behalf of the applicant or any other member of the applicant's family for whom application is made. As part of its medicaid eligibility modernization, the state department shall require the county department or other entity designated to accept applications for medical benefits to enter the third-party information into the automated system developed pursuant to section 25.5-4-204.

The state department shall not pursue recovery from a county for the cost of medical services provided to a person who has been incorrectly determined eligible for medical assistance by that county or any other entity.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 2024, § 1, effective June 3, 2008.)

Source:

L. 2006:

(1)(a.5) added, p. 1592, § 2, effective June 2; entire article added with relocations, p. 1823, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3) and (5)(b) amended, p. 2024, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2009:

(3)(e) added, (HB09-1020), ch. 298, p. 1595, § 1, effective May 21; (3)(b)(I)(C) and (3)(B)(I)(D) amended and (3)(b)(I.5) added, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1974, § 96, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(4) amended, (SB 10-002), ch. 366, p. 1727, § 3, effective June 7; (1)(a.7) added, (HB 10-1041), ch. 25, p. 100, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(3)(b)(I)(A), (3)(b)(I)(B), and (3)(b)(I.5)(A) amended, (HB 12-1120), ch. 27, p. 108, § 25, effective June 1.

L. 2014:

(1)(a), (3)(b)(I)(A), (3)(b)(I)(B), (3)(b)(I.5), and (3)(d)(II) amended, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 109, § 2, effective February 27.

L. 2021:

(1)(a.7) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 332, § 24, effective July 1, 2024.

25.5-4-205.5. Confined persons - suspension of benefits.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "confined person" means a person who is:

An inmate confined to a correctional institution operated by or under contract with the department of corrections;

Confined in a jail;

Committed to a juvenile commitment facility;

Committed to a department of human services facility pursuant to part 1 of article 8 of title 16, C.R.S.; or

A patient placed in a department of human services facility pursuant to court order or certification.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who, immediately prior to becoming a confined person, was a recipient of medical assistance pursuant to this article 4 or article 5 or 6 of this title 25.5, remains eligible for medical assistance while a confined person; except that medical assistance may not be furnished pursuant to this article 4 or article 5 or 6 of this title 25.5 while the person is a confined person unless federal financial participation is available for the cost of the assistance, including but not limited to juveniles held in a facility operated by or under contract to the division of youth services established pursuant to section 19-2.5-1501 or the department of human services. Once a person is no longer a confined person, the person continues to be eligible for receipt of medical benefits pursuant to this article 4 or article 5 or 6 of this title 25.5 until the person is determined to be ineligible for the receipt of the assistance. To the extent permitted by federal law, the time during which a person is a confined person is not included in any calculation of when the person must recertify his or her eligibility for medical assistance pursuant to this article 4 or article 5 or 6 of this title 25.5.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 903, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1983, § 59, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 746, § 122, effective October 1.

25.5-4-206. Reimbursement to counties - costs of administration.

The state department shall reimburse the county departments for costs of administration incurred by the counties under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title in accordance with the provisions of section 26-1-122 (5), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1825, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-411 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-207. Appeals - rules - applicability.

If an application for medical assistance is not acted upon within a reasonable time after filing of the same, or if an application is denied in whole or in part, or if medical assistance benefits are suspended, terminated, or modified, the applicant or recipient, as the case may be, may appeal to the state department in the manner and form prescribed by the rules of the state department. Except as permitted under federal law, state department rules must provide for at least a ten-day advance notice before the effective date of any suspension, termination, or modification of medical assistance. The county or designated service agency shall notify the applicant or recipient in writing of the basis for the county's decision or action and shall inform the applicant or recipient of the right to a county or service agency conference under the dispute resolution process described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) and of the right to a state-level appeal and the process for appeal.
(1) (a) (I) If an application for medical assistance is not acted upon within a reasonable time after filing of the same, or if an application is denied in whole or in part, or if medical assistance benefits are suspended, terminated, or modified, the applicant or recipient, as the case may be, may appeal to the state department in the manner and form prescribed by the rules of the state department. Except as permitted under federal law, state department rules must provide for at least a ten-day advance notice before the effective date of any suspension, termination, or modification of medical assistance. The county or designated service agency shall notify the applicant or recipient in writing of the basis for the county's decision or action and shall inform the applicant or recipient of the right to a county or service agency conference under the dispute resolution process described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) and of the right to a state-level appeal and the process for appeal.

The applicant or recipient has sixty days after the date of the notice to file an appeal. If the recipient files an appeal prior to the effective date of the intended action, existing medical assistance benefits must automatically continue unchanged until the appeal process is completed, unless the recipient requests in writing that medical assistance benefits not continue during the appeal process; except that, to the extent authorized by federal law, the state department rules may permit existing medical assistance benefits to continue until the appeal process is completed even if the recipient's appeal is filed after the effective date of the intended action. The state department shall promulgate rules consistent with federal law that prescribe the circumstances under which the county or designated service agency may continue benefits if an appeal is filed after the effective date of the intended action. At a minimum, the rules must allow for continuing benefits when the recipient's health or safety is impacted, the recipient was not able to timely respond due to the recipient's disability or employment, the recipient's caregiver was unavailable due to the caregiver's health or employment, or the recipient did not receive the county's or designated service agency's notice prior to the effective date of the intended action.

Either prior to appeal or as part of the filing of an appeal, the applicant or recipient may request the dispute resolution process described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) through the county department or service delivery agency.

Every county department or service delivery agency shall adopt procedures for the resolution of disputes arising between the county department or the service delivery agency and any applicant for or recipient of medical assistance. Such procedures are referred to in this section as the "dispute resolution process". Two or more counties may jointly establish the dispute resolution process. The dispute resolution process must be consistent with rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. The dispute resolution process shall include an opportunity for all clients to have a county conference, upon the client's request, and such requirement may be met through a telephonic conference upon the agreement of the client and the county department. The dispute resolution process need not conform to the requirements of section 24-4-105, C.R.S., as long as the rules adopted by the state board include provisions specifically setting forth expeditious time frames, notice, and an opportunity to be heard and to present information. If the dispute is resolved through the county or service delivery agency's dispute resolution process and the applicant or recipient has already filed an appeal, the county shall inform the applicant or recipient of the process for dismissing the appeal.

The state board shall adopt rules setting forth what other issues, if any, may be appealed by an applicant or recipient to the state department. A hearing need not be granted when either state or federal law requires or results in a reduction or deletion of a medical assistance benefit unless the applicant or recipient is arguing that his or her case does not fit within the parameters set forth by the change in the law. In notifying the applicant or recipient that an appeal is being denied because of a change in state or federal law, the state's notice must inform the applicant or recipient that further appeal should be directed to the appropriate state or federal court.

Upon receipt of an appeal, the office of administrative courts shall give the appellant at least ten days' notice of the hearing date and an opportunity for a fair hearing in accordance with the rules of the state department. The fair hearing must comply with section 24-4-105, C.R.S., and the state department's administrative law judge shall preside.

At the commencement of a hearing that concerns the termination or reduction of an existing benefit, the state department's administrative law judge shall review the legal sufficiency of the notice of action from which the recipient is appealing. If the administrative law judge determines that the notice is legally insufficient, the administrative law judge shall inform the appellant that the termination or reduction may be set aside on the basis of insufficient notice without proceeding to a hearing on the merits. The appellant may affirmatively waive the defense of insufficient notice and agree to proceed with a hearing on the merits or may ask the administrative law judge to decide the appeal on the basis of his or her finding that the notice is legally insufficient. The administrative law judge shall also inform the appellant that the state department may issue legally sufficient notice in the future and that the state department may seek recoupment of benefits if a basis for denial or reduction of benefits is subsequently determined.

This subsection (1)(d.5) applies to hearings conducted on and after January 1, 2018.

The appellant shall have an opportunity to examine all applications and pertinent records concerning the appellant that constitute a basis for the denial, suspension, termination, or modification of medical assistance benefits. The person or persons involved in the decision denying, suspending, terminating, or modifying medical assistance benefits or, if the person or persons are not reasonably available, a person familiar with the facts underlying the basis for the decision, shall be available for cross-examination if requested by the appellant.

All decisions of the state department shall be binding upon the county department involved and shall be complied with by such county department.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1825, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1277), ch. 198, p. 698, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(d.5) added, (HB 17-1126), ch. 123, p. 427, § 1, effective April 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-402 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-208. County duties - transitional medicaid.

County departments shall assist families in completing the reporting requirements for transitional medicaid. This shall include informing families of the transitional medicaid eligibility requirements and the required reporting calendar.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1826, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 116, § 11, effective February 27.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-106.5 as it existed prior to 2006.